Tennessee, session 114, SB1779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who:
(1) Is an alien against whom a valid final order of removal is outstanding
by reason of being a member of any of the classes described in 8 U.S.C. §
1227(a); and
(2) Intentionally fails or refuses to depart from this state within a period of
ninety (90) days from the date of the final order of removal under administrative
processes, or if judicial review is had, then from the date of the final order of the
court.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) If the person has not exhausted all available paths under federal law for
challenging the final order of removal, then the court shall grant a stay of the criminal
proceedings until the person has exhausted all available paths under federal law for
challenging the final order of removal.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who:
SB1779
011180
- 1 -

(1) Is an alien that has been denied admission, excluded, deported, or
removed from the United States or has departed the United States while an order
of exclusion, deportation, or removal is outstanding; and
(2) Thereafter intentionally enters or attempts to enter this state, unless:
(A) Prior to the person's reembarkation at a place outside the
United States or the person's application for admission from foreign
contiguous territory, the United States attorney general has expressly
consented to such person's reapplying for admission; or
(B) With respect to a person previously denied admission and
removed, unless such person shall establish that the person was not
required to obtain such advance consent under federal law.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) If the person has not exhausted all available paths under federal law for
challenging the federal action listed in subdivision (a)(1), then the court shall grant a stay
of the criminal proceedings until the person has exhausted all available paths under
federal law for challenging the action.
SECTION 3.
(a)
(1) Section 2 of this act takes effect on the thirtieth day following the
occurrence of either of the following circumstances, the public welfare requiring
it:
(A) The issuance of the judgment in any decision of the United
States Supreme Court overruling, in whole or in part, Arizona v. United
States, 567 U.S. 387 (2012), thereby authorizing states to determine that
a person is unlawfully present in this state; or
- 2 - 011180

(B) Adoption of a federal statutory provision that, in whole or in
part, removes the preemption of states' ability to determine that a person
is unlawfully present in this state.
(2) The attorney general and reporter shall notify in writing the
Tennessee code commission of the occurrence of either of the circumstances in
subdivision (a)(1) and what date is the thirtieth day following such occurrence.
(b) All other sections of this act take effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare
requiring it.
- 3 - 011180